California, session 20252026, AB907.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 39512.5 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:39512.5. (a) With respect to the members appointed pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 39510, those members shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties to the extent that reimbursement for expenses is not otherwise provided or payable by another public agency or agencies.(b) Reimbursements made pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be made as follows:(1) A member appointed from a district that is specifically named in subdivision (d) of Section 39510 shall be reimbursed by the district from which the person qualified for membership.(2) The member appointed as a board member of a district that is not specifically named in subdivision (d) of Section 39510 shall be reimbursed by the state board.(c) Each member Members described in subdivision (a) shall receive the salary specified in Section 11564 of the Government Code to be paid by the state board.